Utah statutes.
48-1-1.   Definition of terms.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Bankrupt" includes "bankrupt" under the federal bankruptcy laws or "insolvent" under any state insolvency law.

(2)  "Business" includes every trade, occupation, or profession.

(3)  "Conveyance" includes every assignment, lease, mortgage, or encumbrance.

(4)  "Court" includes every court and judge having jurisdiction in the case.

(5)  "Limited liability partnership" means a general partnership:

(a)  registered under Section 48-1-42; and

(b)  complying with Section 48-1-43.

(6)  "Person" includes:

(a)  an individual;

(b)  a partnership;

(c)  a limited liability company;

(d)  a limited liability partnership;

(e)  a corporation; or

(f)  another association.

(7)  "Real property" includes land and any interest or estate in land.

(8)  "Tribe" means a tribe, band, nation, pueblo, or other organized group or community of Indians, including an Alaska Native village, that is legally recognized as eligible for and is consistent with a special program, service, or entitlement provided by the United States to Indians because of their status as Indians.

(9)  "Tribal limited liability partnership" means a limited liability partnership:

(a)  formed under the law of a tribe; and

(b)  that is at least 51% owned or controlled by the tribe.



Amended by Chapter 249, 2008 General Session

